Maryland, session 2025, HB0189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–812.
(a) The Administration shall disqualify any individual from driving a commercial
motor vehicle for a period of 1 year if:
(1) The individual is convicted of committing any of the following offenses
while driving a commercial motor vehicle:
(i) A violation of § 21–902 of this article;
(ii) A violation of a federal law or any other state’s law which is
substantially similar in nature to the provisions in § 21–902 of this article;
(iii) Leaving the scene of an accident which requires disqualification
as provided by the United States Secretary of Transportation;
– 1 –

Ch. 49 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) A crime, other than a crime described in subsection (e) of this
section, that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding 1 year;
(v) A violation of § 25–112 of this article; or
(vi) A violation of § 2–209, § 2–503, § 2–504, § 2–505, or § 2–506 of
the Criminal Law Article;
(2) The individual holds a commercial instructional permit or commercial
driver’s license and is convicted of committing any of the following offenses while driving a
noncommercial motor vehicle:
(i) A violation of § 21–902(a), (c), or (d) of this article;
(ii) A violation of a federal law or any other state’s law which is
substantially similar in nature to the provisions in § 21–902(a), (c), or (d) of this article;
(iii) Leaving the scene of an accident which requires disqualification
as provided by the United States Secretary of Transportation; or
(iv) A crime, other than a crime described in subsection (e) of this
section, that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding 1 year;
(3) The individual, while driving a commercial motor vehicle or while
holding a commercial instructional permit or commercial driver’s license, refuses to
undergo testing as provided in § 16–205.1 of this title or as is required by any other state’s
law or by federal law in the enforcement of 49 C.F.R. § 383.51 Table 1, or 49 C.F.R. §
392.5(a)(2);
(4) The individual drives or attempts to drive a commercial motor vehicle
while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood or breath is 0.04 or greater; [or]
(5) THE INDIVIDUAL, WHILE HOLDING A COMMERCIAL
INSTRUCTIONAL PERMIT OR COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE, DRIVES OR
ATTEMPTS TO DRIVE ANY MOTOR VEHICLE WHILE THE ALCOHOL CONCENTRATION
OF THE PERSON’S BLOOD OR BREATH IS 0.08 OR GREATER; OR
[(5)] (6) The individual drives a commercial motor vehicle when, as a
result of prior violations committed while driving a commercial motor vehicle, the driver’s
commercial instructional permit or commercial driver’s license is revoked, suspended, or
canceled or the driver is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle.
(b) If any of the offenses in subsection (a) of this section occurred while
transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded, the Administration shall
disqualify the individual for a period of 3 years.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 49
(c) The Administration shall disqualify any person from driving a commercial
motor vehicle for life for 2 or more violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection
(a) or (b) of this section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from 2 or more
separate incidents.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 3 –